Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 8 Retirement Of Judges And Court Employees
24-8-320. Municipal Court Retirement Transition Group.

Currently, the municipal judges and court clerks in Arkansas are covered under numerous and separate retirement plans run independently by each municipal government. Under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, all municipal courts in existence shall be known as district courts and all judges of those courts shall become district judges effective January 1, 2005.

The Municipal Court Retirement Transition Group shall be established to review the transition of municipal courts to district courts and to study the impact this transition will have on those retirement benefit plans.

The group shall consist of:

Three (3) members of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs as appointed by the co-chairs of Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs;

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

A representative from the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System appointed by the board;

The President of the Arkansas Municipal League or a designee;

The President of the Association of Arkansas Counties or a designee;

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts or a designee; and

The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration or a designee.

The group shall determine if any legislation is necessary and shall bring it before the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs at the Eighty-fourth General Assembly.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1613, § 4.

24-8-321. Funds closed.

The municipal judge and clerk retirement funds defined in this subchapter are closed effective December 31, 2004.

There will be no new members in these funds after December 31, 2004.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 2.

Cross References.

District Court Clerks' Retirement, § 24-8-901 et seq.

Subchapter 4
— Municipal Judges and Clerks — Counties with Population of 150,000

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 9 repealed prior acts governing retirement of municipal judges but provided that the repeal did not affect the rights of any persons to whom benefits had accrued under those acts (Acts 1953, No. 138; 1955, No. 12 and 1961, No. 80).

Effective Dates.

Acts 1967, No. 126, § 3: Approved Feb. 22, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “Due to the fact that no provision was in Act 19 of 1965 for payment of retirement funds to retirees, and in order to give the authority to the Board of Trustees, it is found that an emergency exists, and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1969, No. 102, § 6: Feb. 25, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “This Act being deemed of importance to the maintenance of desired standards in the administration of justice in the Municipal Court system, and therefore being considered necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist and it shall be in force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 300, § 3: Mar. 16, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “This Act, being deemed of importance to the administration of justice in the Municipal Court system, it is considered necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and an emergency is hereby declared and it shall be in force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 229, § 3: Mar. 5, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is a need for clarification of the law prescribing pension benefits for widows of certain municipal judges; that the present status of the law works an undue hardship on those persons and that this act is necessary to the proper administration of justice and to the peace, health and safety of the people of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared and it shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 793, § 6: Became law without Governor's signature. Noted Mar. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Acts 585 and 586 of 1993 vastly increased the cost of retirement benefits for judges of county municipal courts in counties with populations of more than one-hundred and fifty thousand people; that the retirement benefits paid to retiring municipal judges under those laws are excessively costly to the retirement funds for those counties; and that the fiscal responsibility dictates that only those retirement funds should be used to pay benefits for retiring municipal judges in case there are any deficiencies in the funds. Therefore, in order to guarantee the fiscal soundness of those retirement funds, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Cross References.

District Court Clerks' Retirement, § 24-8-901 et seq.

24-8-401. Board of trustees.

In cities in a county having a population of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) or more, in which county there are two (2) or more municipal courts with a judge of a municipal court licensed to practice law, there is created a board of trustees which shall consist of the mayor, city clerk, city treasurer, city health officer, and municipal judges of the city.

In counties having a population of at least one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) and at least one (1) county municipal court, there is hereby created a board of trustees which shall consist of the county judge, county clerk, county treasurer, and the judge of the county municipal court.

The board shall receive and administer the funds collected under the provisions of this subchapter and shall have the power to make necessary rules therefor.

The board shall have the authority to invest such funds as are not necessary for the immediate use for payment of retirement benefits in interest-bearing securities of the State of Arkansas or certificates of the United States or any or all such securities.

Subject to subdivision (b)(2)(C) of this section, a city or county having municipal judges' and clerks' pension plans with assets in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall have full power to invest and reinvest the moneys of the plan and to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the investments so made, as well as the proceeds of the investments and moneys. Such authority shall be implemented by the mayor and the city treasurer, or the county judge and the county treasurer, respectively.

The investments and reinvestments shall only be made in accordance with the prudent investor rule as set forth in §§ 24-3-417 — 24-3-426 [repealed].

A city or county having municipal judges' and clerks' pension plans with assets in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may employ an investment advisor as its agent to make investment recommendations and to invest the assets pursuant to a written investment policy, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon investments of state retirement systems, as set forth in §§ 24-3-417 — 24-3-426 [repealed].

The investment policy shall not limit the investments to interest-bearing bonds.

A city, mayor, or city treasurer, or county, county judge, or county treasurer, respectively, who complies with the requirements of § 24-3-425(a) [repealed] is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for the decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting the delegation of a trust function from a city or county, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

The city treasurer or county treasurer, as the case may be, shall be the treasurer of the board and, at the direction of the board, shall deposit the funds paid into the board in some suitable depository. He or she shall draw and sign all necessary checks at the direction of the board.

He or she shall execute a bond in a sum fixed by the board to guarantee his or her good faith in the handling of any funds coming into his or her hands under the provisions of this subchapter.

The city clerk or county clerk, as the case may be, shall be the secretary of the board.

The board shall constitute one (1) of its members as chair, who shall serve for a period of two (2) years.

Meetings of the board may be called by the chair or by a majority of the members in a manner established by the board.

The city clerk or county clerk, as the case may be, shall receive the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) for each and every meeting attended, but he or she shall not be paid more than fifty dollars ($50.00) in any one (1) year.

All other members shall serve without pay.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, §§ 1, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-941, 22-947; Acts 1993, No. 585, § 1; 1995, No. 514, § 2; 1999, No. 48, § 1; 1999, No. 331, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subdivision (c)(2) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

24-8-402. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning source and collection of funds, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1965, No. 19, §§ 6, 8; 1973, No. 229, § 2; 1975, No. 883, § 2; 1983, No. 187, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-946, 22-948; Acts 1993, No. 585, § 2. For present law, see § 16-10-308.

24-8-403. Benefits — Frequency of payment — Deficiencies for any judge of municipal court — Proration upon insufficiency of fund for any county municipal judge.

All payments of retirement benefits under this subchapter shall be payable semimonthly.

In case the fund established by this subchapter should ever become deficient to pay retirement benefits due any person under this subchapter, the city treasurer shall verify the deficiency.

This deficiency shall be met by payment from the general funds of the city, and proportionately from the general funds of the county if the salaries of the judges of the municipal courts in the county are paid partially by the county, in the amount as may be necessary to continue the timely payment of retirement benefits to the persons entitled thereto.

Provided, however, that in the case of a county municipal court judge, the deficiency shall not be met by payment from the general funds of the county.

If funds thereafter accruing under this subchapter accumulate to become sufficient for the payment of benefits, then no further payment shall be made from the general funds of the city unless and until the fund provided by this subchapter should again become deficient and the deficiency is verified by the city treasurer.

In the case of a county municipal court judge, should the fund established under this subchapter be insufficient to pay retirement benefits due any such judge, then the fund shall be prorated among those entitled by the board as may be deemed just and equitable.

For the purpose of determining how to prorate benefits, the proration shall be considered just and equitable if:

The board pays the full benefit each month to all eligible retired judges until assets in the fund are depleted for the fiscal year; or

The board decreases all payments to all eligible retired judges by an equal proportion for the fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 5; 1971, No. 300, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-945; Acts 1993, No. 585, § 3; 1995, No. 793, § 1.

24-8-404. Entitlement to benefits generally.

Any judge of a municipal court or county municipal court, licensed to practice law, established in any county having a population of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) or more, according to the most recent federal census, in which county there are two (2) or more municipal courts, and any clerk of such a municipal court appointed by the judges thereof shall be entitled to the benefits established by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 1; 1969, No. 102, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-941; Acts 1993, No. 585, § 4; 1993, No. 586, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 330, § 1, provided that, in addition to all other retirement benefits prescribed by Acts 1965, No. 19, as amended, all judges and clerks of municipal courts located in cities having a population of more than 60,000 but less than 70,000 persons, according to the 1980 Federal Decennial Census, who are now retired or who retire hereafter shall be entitled to health insurance coverage to the extent that it is or was provided by the political subdivision at the time of the retirement of the judge or clerk, including their spouses and dependents who were covered at the time of retirement, to be paid from the retirement fund created by Acts 1965, No. 19, as amended.

Acts 1997, No. 301, § 1, provided:

“No person who retires after the effective date of this act shall be entitled to health insurance coverage under Act 330 of 1987.”

24-8-405. Eligibility for benefits — Regular and disability retirement — Surviving Spouses' rights.

A judge of a municipal court upon reaching age sixty-eight (68) and having served for a minimum of seven (7) years immediately prior to retirement may retire.

If incapacitating illness or disability should occur during any term to which a judge has been elected, he or she shall be eligible to retire at one-half (½) pay as provided in this section.

The retirement salary to be paid to the retiree shall be one-half (½) of the salary being paid at the time of retirement for and during his or her natural life.

Notice of retirement shall be in writing and sent to the chair of the board of trustees who, upon finding that the applicant meets the requirements of this subchapter, shall authorize the secretary of the board to issue vouchers in payment to the applicant in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter for and during the natural life of the applicant.

Upon the death of a judge receiving, or eligible to receive, retirement benefits under this subchapter, leaving a surviving spouse, there shall be paid to the surviving spouse for the remainder of his or her natural life, or until he or she remarries, a sum equal to one-half (½) of the retirement pay which the deceased judge was receiving, or would have been eligible to receive, at the time of his or her death.

Upon the death of a judge while serving in that capacity, leaving a surviving spouse who has been married to and living with the judge for at least five (5) years immediately preceding his or her death, the surviving spouse, if not remarried prior thereto, shall, upon reaching age fifty (50), be entitled to and shall receive, until his or her death or remarriage, benefits in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the retirement benefits to which the deceased judge would have been entitled had he or she been eligible for retirement on the date of his or her death.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 2; 1967, No. 126, § 1; 1973, No. 229, § 1; 1977, No. 721, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-942.

24-8-406. Eligibility for benefits for any judge of municipal court or county municipal court prior to 1995 — Eligibility for benefits for county municipal judge after 1995.

Any judge of a municipal court or county municipal court prior to January 1, 1995, to which this subchapter applies who shall attain age fifty (50) and who shall have served at least sixteen (16) years in office as municipal judge, or at least sixteen (16) years combined service as municipal judge and deputy prosecuting attorney, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, then he or she shall receive retirement pay for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

Any county municipal judge who retires under this subchapter effective before January 1, 1995, shall be entitled to continue to participate in and be covered by the county health insurance program.

On and after January 1, 1995, any judge of a county municipal court to which this subchapter applies who shall attain age sixty-five (65) and who shall have served at least ten (10) years in office as municipal judge, or who shall have served at least twenty (20) years in office as municipal judge, whatever his or her age, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, then he or she shall receive retirement pay for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 3; 1969, No. 102, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-943; Acts 1993, No. 586, § 2; 1995, No. 793, § 2.

24-8-407. Eligibility for benefits — Twenty years of service.

Any judge of a municipal court to which this subchapter applies who shall have served at least twenty (20) years in office as municipal judge, irrespective of age, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter.

If the judge resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another judge, then he or she shall receive retirement pay for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of his or her resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 4; 1969, No. 102, § 3; 1975, No. 637, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-944.

24-8-408. Eligibility for benefits — Clerks.

Any clerk of a municipal court to which this subchapter applies, appointed by the judge or judges of the court, shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this subchapter who:

Attains age sixty (60) and has served in office as clerk for at least ten (10) years;

Attains age sixty-five (65) and has served in office for at least eight (8) years; or

Has served in office for at least twenty (20) years, irrespective of age.

If the clerk resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another clerk, the clerk shall receive retirement pay for and during the remainder of the person’s natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to the clerk at the time of resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

The governing body of the municipality or the county may by ordinance provide that after the death of the clerk, the surviving spouse of a qualifying court clerk can continue to receive the retirement benefits under this subchapter until the surviving spouse dies or remarries.

Any clerk of a municipal court who is covered by the provisions of this subchapter and who has seven (7) or more years of service in any position in the office of the county sheriff shall be entitled to have the service in the office of the county sheriff credited as municipal court clerk service.

The service so converted shall be treated the same as if it were service as clerk of a municipal court in the county for purposes of determining eligibility for retirement under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 19, § 4; 1969, No. 102, § 3; 1975, No. 637, § 1; 1979, No. 155, § 1; 1979, No. 660, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-944, 22-948.1; Acts 2001, No. 1613, § 3; 2019, No. 84, § 7.

Publisher's Notes.

The fourth classification in subsection (a) was held unconstitutional as special legislation in Board of Trustees v. Beard, 273 Ark. 423, 620 S.W.2d 295 (1981).

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (a)(1)(D).

24-8-409. Clerks' benefits — Actuarial valuations — Transfer of funds.

The city treasurer shall cause an actuarial valuation to be made of the additional liabilities created by § 24-8-408. In the event the actuary determines that the employee and employer contributions are actuarially insufficient to pay the benefits to retired municipal officers as provided by § 24-8-408, the city treasurer shall establish accounts and records to identify the estimated contributions and other income available to actuarially fund the members' benefits when they mature and the extent that the city's member liabilities will exceed the amount of employee and employer contributions and interest thereon.

The city treasurer shall then calculate with the assistance of the actuary the amount of funds required annually to actuarially fund the additional unfunded liabilities created by § 24-8-408. He or she shall annually certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount required for the year to establish sufficient funds and reserves to meet the actuarial requirements of the additional benefits.

The certificate of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall reflect the amount of the annual extra payment to be charged against the municipality, based on the unfunded liabilities with respect to its official and employee members.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause the amount so certified to be transferred from the Municipal Aid Fund, from general revenues allocated to that fund for turnback to cities, to the municipality for credit to the municipal court clerks' retirement fund.

From the general revenues allocated thereto for turnback to municipalities, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall deduct from the Municipal Aid Fund turnback to be received by the city an amount as computed pursuant to this section required to pay retirement benefits for its elected municipal clerk.

The moneys to be transferred from the Municipal Aid Fund shall not be charged against the total of the Municipal Aid Fund moneys available for distribution to cities, since it is the intent of this section that each city shall pay annually, from its municipal aid general revenues turnback, the amount of money required to meet the unfunded liability deficit in behalf of its city employee members.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 155, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-944.1.

24-8-410. Benefits.

Any person participating in a retirement plan authorized under this subchapter on or after July 1, 1999, shall be entitled to a retirement benefit if that person has ten (10) or more years of actual service in a plan covered by this subchapter and is at least sixty (60) years of age. If the person does not have sufficient service to draw the full benefit provided, then a partial benefit not to exceed the full benefit shall be payable when the person has reached the age requirement specified in this subchapter. The partial benefit shall be determined by multiplying the full benefit by the following fraction:

The numerator shall be the number of months of actual service under the provisions of this subchapter; and

The denominator shall be two hundred forty (240) months.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 2.

24-8-411. Funds closed.

The municipal judge and clerk retirement funds defined in this subchapter are closed effective December 31, 2004.

There will be no new members in these funds after December 31, 2004.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 3.

Cross References.

District Court Clerks' Retirement, § 24-8-901 et seq.

Subchapter 5
— Municipal Judges and Clerks and Police Judges — Miscellaneous Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 480, § 3: Mar. 27, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained and declared that the appreciation of the citizens of Arkansas should be shown to persons serving twenty (20) years or more as Municipal Judge and/or Police Judge, and that all pension benefits which such Municipal Judge or Police Judge is entitled to should be allowed them in addition to the pension allowed in this Act; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that benefit provisions applicable to local officers and employees need revision, and that the effective administration of this act makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Cross References.

District Court Clerks' Retirement, § 24-8-901 et seq.

24-8-501. Municipal or police judges.

Any person who has held office as municipal judge or police judge for a period of thirty (30) years or more shall receive during the remainder of his or her life, as a pension, one-half (½) of the salary payable to the municipal judge of the court he or she served upon his or her retirement from office.

The pension shall be payable in the same manner as the salary of the municipal judge is paid.

Any person who has held the office of municipal judge and, upon retirement, has accumulated not less than twenty (20) years or more of service as municipal judge or police judge shall, upon reaching sixty (60) years of age, receive, as a pension for the remainder of his or her life, an amount which shall be based on the salary payable to the judge of the municipal court on which he or she served prior to his or her retirement from office.

The amount shall be one-half (½) of the salary which was payable to the municipal judge of the court on July 1, 1973, but in no event shall that person receive less than one-half (½) of the annual salary which was paid to him or her at the time of his or her retirement or at the time that he or she was succeeded by another judge.

The pension shall be payable in the same manner as the salary of the municipal judge is paid.

Any municipal judge who is entitled to a pension under any previous act shall be entitled to receive his or her pension benefits under this section.

Any person who has served four (4) or more years as a member of the General Assembly and has held the office of municipal judge and, upon retirement, has accumulated not less than twelve (12) years of service as municipal judge shall receive, upon reaching sixty (60) years of age, as a pension for the remainder of his or her life, an amount which shall be based on the salary payable to the judge of the municipal court on which he or she served prior to retirement from office.

The amount shall be three-tenths (3/10) of the salary of the present municipal judge, but in no event shall that person receive less than three-tenths (3/10) of the salary which was paid to him or her at the time of his or her retirement or at the time he or she was succeeded by another judge.

The pension shall be paid in the same manner as provided in this section for judges having twenty (20) years or more of service.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 160, § 1; 1969, No. 279, § 1; 1971, No. 62, § 1; 1973, No. 480, § 1; 1975, No. 998, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-739; Acts 1995, No. 555, § 1.

24-8-502, 24-8-503. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning municipal clerks in counties with a population between 75,500 and 80,000 and municipal clerks in cities with a population between 25,300 and 27,000, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 555, § 1. They were derived from the following sources:

24-8-502. Acts 1959, No. 103, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-744 — 22-747.

24-8-503. Acts 1971, No. 83, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-743.

24-8-504. Clerks of city court.

Any clerk of a city court established in any county, appointed by the judges thereof, may be entitled to the benefits prescribed in this section for such clerks.

Any clerk of a city court to which this section applies, appointed by the judges of the court, who shall attain age sixty (60) and who shall have served in office as clerk for at least ten (10) years, or who shall have served in office for at least twenty (20) years, irrespective of age, may be eligible to receive retirement benefits provided by this section.

If the clerk resigns, retires from office, or is succeeded in office by another clerk, the clerk shall receive retirement benefits for and during the remainder of his or her natural life in an amount equal to one-half (½) of the salary payable to him or her at the time of resignation, retirement, or succession in office.

Upon the approval of the governing body of the city and following a determination of the actuarial soundness of the fund from which the benefits shall be paid, any court clerk of a city court who upon reaching age sixty-eight (68) will have served for a minimum of seven (7) years immediately prior to severance from employment may retire with a reduced benefit in an amount equal to seven-tenths (7/10) of the benefit payable under this section.

The city council or board of directors of each city of the second class may elect by ordinance to establish the retirement system for city court clerks authorized by this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 40, § 1.

24-8-505. Benefits.

Any person participating in a retirement plan authorized under this subchapter on or after July 1, 1999, shall be entitled to a retirement benefit if that person has ten (10) or more years of actual service in a plan covered by this subchapter and is at least sixty (60) years of age. If the person does not have sufficient service to draw the full benefit provided, then a partial benefit not to exceed the full benefit shall be payable when the person has reached the age requirement specified in this subchapter. The partial benefit shall be determined by multiplying the full benefit by the following fraction:

The numerator shall be the number of months of actual service under the provisions of this subchapter; and

The denominator shall be two hundred forty (240) months.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 3.

24-8-506. Funds closed.

The municipal judge and clerk retirement funds defined in this subchapter are closed effective December 31, 2004.

There will be no new members in these funds after December 31, 2004.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 4.

Cross References.

District Court Clerks' Retirement, § 24-8-901 et seq.

Subchapter 6
— Deferred Retirement Option Plan

24-8-601 — 24-8-604. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 399, § 4. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-8-601. Acts 1997, No. 1162, § 1.

24-8-602. Acts 1997, No. 1162, § 2.

24-8-603. Acts 1997, No. 1162, § 3.

24-8-604. Acts 1997, No. 1162, § 4.

Subchapter 7
— Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-701 — 24-8-716 may not apply to § 24-8-717 which was enacted subsequently.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 8: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should be effective at a time certain which is consistent with the actuarial evaluations of the Judicial Retirement System; that the failure of the act to be effective at a time certain will disrupt the proper administration of the Judicial Retirement System; that the Judicial Retirement System utilizes the state fiscal year as its accounting year for actuarial purposes; that without this emergency clause this act may not become effective until after July 1, 2001. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 232, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

24-8-701. Legislative history, findings, and intent.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the creation of the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan is part of a history of judicial retirement legislation that has sought to develop a more equitable retirement system for judges and thereby remove the need for judges to be involved in the political process through lobbying for retirement benefits and privileges.

At one time member contributions were not sufficient to fund the system and therefore it was necessary for the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and other members of the judicial system to ask the General Assembly for funds to pay benefits for retired judges and justices. In 1983 the need for members of the judiciary to be involved in the political process was reduced by the establishment of an actuarial funding method and by transfer of the administration of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Initially the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System allowed a judge with fifteen (15) years of elective service to retire upon reaching age sixty-five (65). However, this system was awkward and some judges with many years of service did not qualify for benefits because the system did not provide for graduated benefits. Because of this “all or nothing” plan, the law has been amended a number of times to help judges qualify for benefits through use of credited service.

The use of credited service substantially changed the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System. The system was changed to allow an active member with ten (10) years of credited service to retire upon reaching age sixty-five (65) and to allow other members with twenty (20) years of credited service to retire regardless of age, or a member with fourteen (14) years of service to retire upon reaching age sixty-five (65). At the time of the passage of this act, the average retirement benefit paid by the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System was based on approximately twelve (12) years of actual service.

The reasons for including credited service are not as strong as they once were because reciprocity exists among state-supported retirement systems. A judge with military service and who is employed or becomes employed in a position covered by another state-supported retirement system may obtain credited service in the other system for that military service.

In 1997 legislation was adopted to authorize the establishment of a judicial deferred retirement option plan. The legislation was enacted in response to the average retirement benefit paid by the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System being based on only twelve (12) years of actual service. The legislature sought to encourage longer actual service by judges and justices.

For two (2) years the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs and the Arkansas Judicial Council discussed ways to establish a fair retirement system and to eliminate the need for members of the judicial system to be involved in the political process in order to obtain equitable treatment. It was agreed that the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System had good benefits but that other aspects of the system needed revision. After discussion and negotiation between the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs and the Arkansas Judicial Council it was agreed that the authorization for a judicial deferred retirement option plan should be repealed and that a new system judicial retirement plan should be established that would be based on actual service and which would provide graduated benefits for judges and justices.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the legislative history of the development of the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan demonstrates that the purpose of this subchapter is to provide a fair retirement plan based on actual service and to provide for graduated benefits for retired judges and justices. Therefore, any future attempt to add credited service into this plan would run contrary to the legislative history of this act and the agreements that resulted in the adoption of this plan, and would constitute a major breach of a negotiated change in judicial retirement that balanced the removal of credited service provisions with provisions to allow judges and justices to have graduated benefits and earlier benefit rights.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1999, No. 399, codified as §§ 24-1-106, 24-2-501, 24-8-218, 24-8-701 — 24-8-716. As to the “passage of this act,” Acts 1999, No. 399, was approved March 4, 1999, and became effective July 30, 1999.